West Virginia, session 2026, HB4082.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-47. Budget review by Legislature. Annually, the State Board of Education shall provide a complete and in-depth budget for review to the Legislature.  This budget shall include all monies received and spent by the State Board of Education.